Wyoming, session 2026, HB0155.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-15-105 by creating new subsections
(c) and (d) and 39-16-105 by creating new subsections (c)
and (d) are amended to read:

39-15-105. Exemptions; reporting.

HB0155

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0361
(c) Each taxpayer paying sales tax under this article
that claims one (1) or more of the exemptions provided in
W.S. 39-15-105(a)(iii)(A), (E), (F) or (G), (vi)(C),
(vii)(A) or (B), (viii)(A), (B), (F), (G), (J), (O), (P),
(R) or (S) in any one (1) calendar year shall submit a
report to the department in accordance with all of the
following:

(i) A report shall be required only of any
taxpayer who claims one (1) or more of the exemptions
specified in this subsection in an amount not less than two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) of sales tax
exempted in the applicable year;

(ii) The report shall contain the following
information:

(A) The amount of sales tax the taxpayer
collected from customers at all Wyoming locations during
the preceding year, if the taxpayer is a vendor;

HB0155

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0361
(B) The amount of sales tax paid by the
taxpayer directly to Wyoming vendors or to the department
in the preceding year;

(C) The amount of sales tax forgone as a
result of the exemptions claimed by the taxpayer in the
preceding year, if the purchase was otherwise subject to
taxation;

(D) The amount of ad valorem taxes the
taxpayer paid in Wyoming in the preceding year;

(E) The total number of full-time and
part-time Wyoming employees employed by the taxpayer, the
average wage and benefit amount for each full-time employee
and the average wage and benefit amount for each part-time
employee employed by the taxpayer in the preceding year.
For purposes of this subparagraph, the report shall
identify the number of employees reported under this
subparagraph that both work and reside in Wyoming.
Information reported under this subparagraph shall be
reported in the aggregate without reference to or
HB0155

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0361
identification of the personally identifiable information
of any one (1) employee or person.

(iii) A taxpayer who claims both sales and use
tax exemptions and is required to report under this
subsection and W.S. 39-16-105(c) shall submit all of the
information required in this subsection and W.S.
39-16-105(c) in one (1) report to the department;

(iv) Each taxpayer required to report under this
subsection shall submit the report to the department not
later than February 1 of the year immediately following the
calendar year in which the taxpayer took the exemptions
specified in this subsection;

(v) A taxpayer required to report under this
subsection who does not submit the report by the date
specified in paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall:

(A) Pay the difference in sales tax for the
preceding year that would have been required had the
taxpayer not claimed the exemptions specified in this
HB0155

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0361
subsection, plus any interest and penalty applicable under
W.S. 39-15-108; and

(B) Be ineligible to claim any of the
exemptions specified in this subsection for the current
year in which a report was due but not submitted by the
date specified in paragraph (iv) of this subsection.

(d) Not later than August 1, 2027 and each August 1
thereafter, the department shall report to the joint
revenue interim committee on the reports submitted under
this subsection. The report shall include, in the
aggregate, the information provided by each taxpayer under
paragraph (ii) of this subsection.

39-16-105. Exemptions; reporting.

(c) Each person paying use tax under this article
that claims one (1) or more of the exemptions provided in
W.S. 39-16-105(a)(iii)(A) or (C), (vi)(C), (viii)(A), (B),
(D), (E), (G) or (H) in any one (1) year shall submit a
report to the department in accordance with all of the
following:
HB0155

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0361

(i) A report shall be required only of any
taxpayer who claims one (1) or more of the exemptions
specified in this subsection in an amount not less than two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) of use tax
exempted in the applicable year;

(ii) The report shall contain the following
information:

(A) The amount of use tax the taxpayer
collected from customers at all Wyoming locations during
the preceding year, if the taxpayer is a vendor;

(B) The amount of use tax paid by the
taxpayer directly to Wyoming vendors or to the department
in the preceding year;

(C) The amount of use tax forgone as a
result of the exemptions claimed by the taxpayer in the
preceding year, if the purchase was otherwise subject to
taxation;

HB0155

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0361
(D) The amount of ad valorem taxes the
taxpayer paid in Wyoming in the preceding year;

(E) The total number of full-time and
part-time Wyoming employees employed by the taxpayer, the
average wage and benefit amount for each full-time employee
and the average wage and benefit amount for each part-time
employee employed by the taxpayer in the preceding year.
For purposes of this subparagraph, the report shall
identify the number of employees reported under this
subparagraph that both work and reside in Wyoming.
Information reported under this subparagraph shall be
reported in the aggregate without reference to or
identification of the personally identifiable information
of any one (1) employee or person.

(iii) A taxpayer who claims both sales and use
tax exemptions and is required to report under this
subsection and W.S. 39-15-105(c) shall submit all of the
information required in this subsection and W.S.
39-15-105(c) in one (1) report to the department;

HB0155

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0361
(iv) Each taxpayer required to report under this
subsection shall submit the report to the department not
later than February 1 of the year immediately following the
calendar year in which the taxpayer took the exemptions
specified in this subsection;

(v) A taxpayer required to report under this
subsection who does not submit the report by the date
specified in paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall:

(A) Pay the difference in use tax for the
preceding year that would have been required had the
taxpayer not claimed the exemptions specified in this
subsection, plus any interest and penalty applicable under
W.S. 39-16-108; and

(B) Be ineligible to claim any of the
exemptions specified in this subsection for the current
year in which a report was due but not submitted by the
date specified in paragraph (iv) of this subsection.

(d) Not later than August 1, 2027 and each August 1
thereafter, the department shall report to the joint
HB0155

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0361
revenue interim committee on the reports submitted under
this subsection. The report shall include, in the
aggregate, the information provided by each taxpayer under
paragraph (ii) of this subsection.

Section 2. This act shall apply to all taxpayers
claiming the exemptions specified in section 1 of this act
beginning with the 2026 calendar year.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0155